South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-23-45(A) and (B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Beginning January 1, 2025, all 911 telecommunicators that provide dispatch for emergency medical conditions shall be required to be trained, utilizing the most current nationally recognized cardiovascular care guidelines, in high-quality T-CPR.  The instruction shall incorporate recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrest (OHCA), compression-only CPR instruction for callers, and continuous education which must be completed on an annual basis. Also, these individuals must complete successfully annual wellness examinations. (B) All agencies within this State employing 911 telecommunicators that provide dispatch for emergency medical conditions shall be responsible for providing the instruction and wellness examinations specified in subsection (A). SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-9-200.   The State Fire Marshal shall require all firefighters to complete successfully annual wellness examinations. SECTION 3.  Section 44-61-80(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The department shall develop and approve educational standards for the necessary classification of emergency medical technicians and approve the training program for the necessary classifications of emergency medical technicians. The department also shall require all emergency medical technicians to complete successfully annual wellness examinations. SECTION 4.  Chapter 23, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-23-57.   All law enforcement officers are required to complete successfully annual wellness examinations. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----